North Carolina, session 2025, HB849.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-18(10) reads as rewritten:
"(10) To make proper and reasonable rules, regulations, and ordinances for the
placing or erection of telephone, telegraph, electric, and other lines, above or
below ground, wireless facilities, signboards, fences, gas, water, sewerage,
oil, or other pipelines, and other similar obstructions that may, in the opinion
of the Department of Transportation, contribute to the hazard upon any of the
highways or in any way interfere with the highways, and to make reasonable
rules and regulations for the proper control thereof. And whenever the order
of the Department of Transportation shall require the removal of, or changes
in, the location of telephone, telegraph, electric, or other lines, wireless
facilities, signboards, fences, gas, water, sewerage, oil, or other pipelines, or
other similar obstructions, the owners thereof shall at their own expense,
except as provided in G.S. 136-19.5(c), G.S. 136-19.5(c) or
G.S. 136-19.5(c1), move or change them to conform to the order of the
Department of Transportation. Any violation of these rules and regulations or
noncompliance with these orders constitutes a Class 1 misdemeanor. For
purposes of this subdivision, "wireless facilities" has the definition set forth in
G.S. 160D-931."
SECTION 2. G.S. 136-19.5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c1) If the relocation of utility facilities within the meaning of 23 U.S.C. § 123, and as
applied by the U.S. Department of Transportation in 23 C.F.R. § 645.105, is necessitated by the
construction of a project on the federal-aid interstate system, including extensions thereof within
urban areas, and the cost of the project is eligible and approved for reimbursement by the federal
government under the Federal-Aid Highway Act, or any amendment thereof, then in that event
the owner or operator of the facilities shall perform any necessary work upon notice from the
Department of Transportation, and the State shall pay the entire expense properly attributable to
such work after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage
value derived from the old facility."
*H849-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Article 15 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160A-296.2. Relocation of communications service facilities.
Whenever a city requires or directs the removal or relocation of facilities installed or operated
in the city's rights-of-way by an owner or operator of broadband services, video programming
services pursuant to a franchise issued by the Secretary of State, telephone or telegraph lines, or
a wireless facility, as defined in G.S. 160D-931(22), the owner or operator shall remove or
relocate the facilities, and the city shall reimburse the owner or operator for the costs and
expenses attributable thereto. This section shall not apply to a city with a population of less than
5,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census, unless the removal or relocation is
required or directed by the city for a road improvement or construction project funded exclusively
with federal funds."
SECTION 4. G.S. 160A-479.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-479.15. Removal and relocation of utility structures.
(a) An authority may require any public utility, railroad, or other public service
corporation owning or operating any installations, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances
or facilities in, upon, under, over, across or along any land or facility where an authority has the
right to own, construct, operate or maintain its facilities to remove or relocate such installation,
structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or facilities from their location. For purposes of this
section, the term "public service corporation" includes an owner or operator of broadband
services, video programming services pursuant to a franchise issued by the Secretary of State,
telephone or telegraph lines, or a wireless facility, as that term is defined in G.S. 160D-931(22).
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 160A-621 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-621. Removal and relocation of utility structures.
(a) The Authority shall have the power to require any public utility, railroad, or other
public service corporation owning or operating any installations, structures, equipment,
apparatus, appliances or facilities in, upon, under, over, across or along any ways on which the
Authority has the right to own, construct, operate or maintain its public transportation system, to
relocate such installation, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or facilities from their
locations, or, in the sole discretion of the affected public utility, railroad, or other public service
corporation, to remove such installations, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or
facilities from their locations. For purposes of this section, the term "public service corporation"
includes an owner or operator of broadband services, video programming services pursuant to a
franchise issued by the Secretary of State, telephone or telegraph lines, or a wireless facility, as
that term is defined in G.S. 160D-931(22).
…."
SECTION 6. G.S. 160A-651 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-651. Removal and relocation of utility structures.
(a) The Authority shall have the power to require any public utility, railroad, or other
public service corporation owning or operating any installations, structures, equipment,
apparatus, appliances, or facilities in, upon, under, over, across or along any ways on which the
Authority has the right to own, construct, operate, or maintain its public transportation system,
to relocate such installation, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances, or facilities from their
locations, or, in the sole discretion of the affected public utility, railroad, or other public service
corporation, to remove such installations, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances, or
facilities from their locations. For purposes of this section, the term "public service corporation"
includes an owner or operator of broadband services, video programming services pursuant to a
franchise issued by the Secretary of State, telephone or telegraph lines, or a wireless facility, as
that term is defined in G.S. 160D-931(22).
…."
Page 2 House Bill 849-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 849-First Edition Page 3